Utah statutes.
35A-9-306.   Members serve without pay -- Reimbursement for expenses.

A member of the commission or the advisory committee may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(1)  Section 63A-3-106;

(2)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(3)  rules by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Enacted by Chapter 59, 2013 General Session

